Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.130

Notice of intention—Contents.

The notice of intention shall contain the following information:

(1) The nature of the action sought;

(2) A brief statement of the reasons for the proposed action;

(3) The legal description of the boundaries proposed to be created, abolished or changed by such action: PROVIDED, That the legal description may be altered, with concurrence of the initiators of the proposed action, if a person designated by the county legislative authority as one who has expertise in legal descriptions makes a determination that the legal description is erroneous; and

(4) A county assessor's map on which the boundaries proposed to be created, abolished or changed by such action are designated: PROVIDED, That at the discretion of the boundary review board a map other than the county assessor's map may be accepted.

[ 1987 c 477 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 111 s 7; 1967 c 189 s 13.]